Maryland, session 2026, HB0563.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
10–606.
(a) (1) In this section, “sexual contact with an animal” means any act:
(i) involving:
1. a person touching the sex organ or anus of an animal;
2. contact between:
A. the sex organ or anus of a person and the mouth, sex
organ, or anus of an animal; or
B. the sex organ or anus of an animal, and the mouth, sex
organ, or anus of a person; or
3. insertion of:
A. any part of the body of a person into the opening of the
vagina or anus of an animal;
B. any part of an animal’s body into the opening of the vagina
or anus of a person; or
C. any object into the opening of the vagina or anus of an
animal; and
(ii) committed for the purpose of sexual arousal, sexual gratification,
abuse, or financial gain.

HOUSE BILL 563 3
(2) “Sexual contact with an animal” does not include:
(i) an accepted veterinary practice;
(ii) artificial insemination of an animal for reproductive purposes;
(iii) accepted animal husbandry practices, including:
1. grooming;
2. raising;
3. breeding;
4. assisting with the birthing process; or
5. any other activity that provides care for an animal; or
(iv) generally accepted practices relating to the judging of breed
confirmation.
(b) A person may not:
(1) intentionally:
(i) mutilate an animal;
(ii) torture an animal;
(iii) cruelly beat an animal;
(iv) cruelly kill an animal; or
(v) engage in sexual contact with an animal; OR
(2) cause, procure, or authorize an act prohibited under item (1) of this
subsection[; or
(3) except in the case of self–defense, intentionally inflict bodily harm,
permanent disability, or death on an animal owned or used by a law enforcement unit].
(c) (1) A person who violates this section is guilty of the felony of aggravated
cruelty to animals and on conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 3 years or a
fine not exceeding $5,000 or both.

HOUSE BILL 563
(2) As a condition of sentencing, the court may:
(i) order a defendant convicted of violating this section to:
1. participate in and pay for psychological counseling; and
2. pay, in addition to any other fines and costs, all reasonable
costs incurred in removing, housing, treating, or euthanizing an animal confiscated from
the defendant; and
(ii) prohibit a defendant from owning, possessing, or residing with
an animal for a specified period of time.
10–606.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “EMERGENCY RESPONSE ANIMAL” MEANS:
(I) A DOG USED BY A LAW ENFORCEMENT UNIT IN THE STATE
THAT IS TRAINED FOR LAW ENFORCEMENT WORK AND IS SUBJECT TO THE CONTROL
OF A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER WHO HAS COMPLETED HANDLER TRAINING IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE POLICIES OF THE LAW ENFORCEMENT UNIT THAT EMPLOYS
THE OFFICER;
(II) A HORSE USED BY A LAW ENFORCEMENT UNIT IN THE STATE
FOR LAW ENFORCEMENT WORK; OR OR
(III) A SEARCH AND RESCUE DOG TRAINED FOR OR ENGAGED IN
AN EFFORT DIRECTED BY A STATE AGENCY OR A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE
STATE TO LOCATE OR RESCUE A LOST, INJURED, OR DECEASED INDIVIDUAL; OR
(IV) A HORSE USED IN A SEARCH AND RESCUE EFFORT DIRECTED
BY A STATE AGENCY OR A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE TO LOCATE OR
RESCUE A LOST, INJURED, OR DECEASED INDIVIDUAL.
(3) “LAW ENFORCEMENT UNIT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
10–101 OF THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE; OR
(IV) A HORSE USED IN A SEARCH AND RESCUE EFFORT
DIRECTED BY A STATE AGENCY OR A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE TO
LOCATE OR RESCUE A LOST, INJURED, OR DECEASED INDIVIDUAL.

HOUSE BILL 563 5
(3) “LAW ENFORCEMENT UNIT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
10–101 OF THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE.
(3) (4) “SERIOUS PHYSICAL INJURY” MEANS PHYSICAL INJURY
THAT CAUSES PERMANENT OR PROTRACTED:
(I) DISFIGUREMENT;
(II) LOSS OF THE FUNCTION OF ANY BODILY MEMBER OR
ORGAN; OR
(III) IMPAIRMENT OF THE FUNCTION OF ANY BODILY MEMBER
OR ORGAN.
(B) (1) (1) A EXCEPT IN THE CASE OF SELF–DEFENSE, A A PERSON MAY
NOT:
(1) INTENTIONALLY HARASS OR INTERFERE WITH AN EMERGENCY
RESPONSE ANIMAL DURING THE LAWFUL PERFORMANCE OF THE EMERGENCY
RESPONSE ANIMAL’S DUTIES.;.
(2) A PERSON MAY NOT A PERSON MAY NOT INTENTIONALLY INJURE
AN EMERGENCY RESPONSE ANIMAL.;.
(3) A PERSON MAY NOT A PERSON MAY NOT VIOLATE PARAGRAPH
ITEM PARAGRAPH (1) OR (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION DURING THE COMMISSION OF A
CRIME.; OR.
(4) A PERSON MAY NOT A PERSON MAY NOT INTENTIONALLY KILL OR
CAUSE SERIOUS PHYSICAL INJURY TO AN EMERGENCY RESPONSE ANIMAL.
(C) (1) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES SUBSECTION (B)(1) OR (2) OF THIS
SECTION IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO
IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 1 YEAR OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 OR
BOTH.
(2) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES SUBSECTION (B)(3) OR (4) OF THIS
SECTION IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO
IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 2 YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $15,000
$10,000 OR BOTH.

HOUSE BILL 563
(3) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES SUBSECTION (B)(4) OF THIS SECTION IS
GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT
NOT EXCEEDING 5 YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $10,000 OR BOTH.
(D) A SENTENCE IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY BE IMPOSED
SEPARATE FROM AND CONSECUTIVE TO OR CONCURRENT WITH A SENTENCE FOR
ANY CRIME BASED ON THE ACT ESTABLISHING THE VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(E) (D) (1) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION PROHIBITS A DEFENDANT FROM
ASSERTING THE DEFENSE OF NECESSITY OR SELF–DEFENSE TO A CHARGE OF
VIOLATING THIS SECTION.
(2) IT IS AN AFFIRMATIVE DEFENSE TO A CHARGE OF VIOLATING THIS
SECTION THAT THE DEFENDANT ACTED REASONABLY TO PREVENT PHYSICAL HARM
RESULTING FROM A VIOLATION OF THE MARYLAND USE OF FORCE STATUTE UNDER
§ 3–524 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE.
Article – Criminal Procedure
10–101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(g) “Law enforcement unit” means a State, county, or municipal police
department or unit, the office of a sheriff, the office of a State’s Attorney, the Office of the
State Prosecutor, or the Office of the Attorney General of the State.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.